California, session 20252026, SB805.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The federal government has launched broad immigration enforcement efforts in California, deploying personnel from various federal agencies.(b) The increasing use of face coverings, the absence of visible names, officer identification number, or other individually identifying information, the failure to be clearly and conspicuously identifiable as federal law enforcement, or the use of unmarked vehicles during enforcement activities has raised concerns for public safety.(c) Both the individuals involved and onlookers have reported confusion and fear that they were experiencing or witnessing a crime.(d) In a widely reported incident, when two plain-clothed federal officers wearing masks tackled a woman on the sidewalk and forcibly placed her in an unmarked vehicle, the woman’s family called 911 to report a kidnapping.(e) Several news outlets have reported incidents of individuals impersonating federal law enforcement officers to harass or detain others, which undermines public trust in law enforcement, especially among vulnerable individuals.(f) Charges filed against individuals include kidnapping and impersonating a police officer after allegedly detaining a group of Latino men, impersonating an officer on a university campus, and impersonating an officer in connection with the sexual assault of a woman while threatening her with deportation.(g) While the federal government has publicly condemned impersonations, the use of face coverings and lack of consistent, visible personal and agency identification are making it difficult for individuals and state and local law enforcement to distinguish between authorized personnel and bad actors.(h) The state has both the authority and responsibility, under its police powers, to maintain order and protect the safety and well-being of all people within its jurisdiction.(i) In order to carry out this duty effectively, the state has the authority to establish identification requirements for law enforcement operating within the state so that the public and its agents can distinguish between individuals who are exercising law enforcement authority and those who are not, particularly in situations where a person is engaging in potentially unlawful behavior.(j) Therefore, the state has a compelling interest in identifying and verifying who is and who is not validly claiming or operating under law enforcement authority within the state.SEC. 2. Chapter 17.45 (commencing with Section 7288) is added to Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 17.45. Law Enforcement Policies7288. (a) By January 1, 2026, a law enforcement agency operating in California shall maintain and publicly post a written policy on the visible identification of sworn personnel. The policy shall include, at minimum, the following:(1) A purpose statement affirming the agency’s commitment to both of the following:(A) Transparency, accountability, and public trust.(B) Restricting situations in which sworn personnel do not visibly display identification to specific, clearly defined, and limited circumstances.(2) A requirement that all sworn personnel visibly display identification that includes their agency and either a name or badge number, or both name and badge number, when performing enforcement duties.(3) A list of narrowly tailored exemptions for the following:(A) Officers engaged in active undercover operations or investigative activities.(B) An officer engaged in plainclothes operations who is employed within the California Business, Consumer Services, and Housing Agency, California Health and Human Services Agency, California Labor and Workforce Development Agency, California Natural Resources Agency, California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, California Transportation Agency, California Environmental Protection Agency, California Government Operations Agency, or within any department, board, commission, or other entity in those agencies or the federal equivalents of these state agencies.(C) Officers wearing personal protective equipment that prevents display.(D) Exigent circumstances, involving an imminent danger to persons or property, or the escape of a perpetrator, or the destruction of evidence, including if the officer is responding to those circumstances while off-duty.(E) When there is a specific, articulable, and particularized reason to believe identification would pose a significant danger to the physical safety of the peace officer.(b) A policy adopted pursuant to this section shall be deemed consistent with Section 13654 of the Penal Code unless a verified written challenge to its legality is submitted to the head of the agency by a member of the public, an oversight body, or a local governing authority, at which time the agency shall be afforded 90 days to correct any deficiencies in the policy. If, after 90 days, the agency has failed to adequately address the complaint, the complaining party may proceed to a court of competent jurisdiction for a judicial determination of the agency’s exemption provided by subdivision (e) of Section 13654 of the Penal Code. The agency and its employees’ exemptions shall remain in effect unless a court rules the agency’s policy is not in compliance with subdivision (e) of Section 13564 of the Penal Code, and all potential appeals to higher courts have been exhausted by the agency.(c) For purpose of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Enforcement duties” means active and planned operations involving the arrest or detention of an individual, or deployment for crowd control purposes.(2) “Law enforcement agency” means all of the following:(A) Any law enforcement agency, department, or other entity of the state or any political subdivision thereof, that employs any peace officer described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.(B) Any law enforcement agency of another state.(C) Any federal law enforcement agency.(3) “Visibly display identification” means to wear externally on the uniform in a size and location such as to be reasonably visible to member of the public with whom the officer interacts.SEC. 3. Section 538d of the Penal Code is amended to read:538d. (a) Any person other than one who by law is given the authority of a law enforcement officer, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the authorized uniform, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing, of a law enforcement officer, with the intent of fraudulently impersonating a law enforcement officer, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are a law enforcement officer, or who willfully and credibly impersonates a law enforcement officer through or on an internet website, by other electronic means, or by any other means, for purposes of defrauding another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.(b) (1) Any person, other than the one who by law is given the authority of a law enforcement officer, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the badge of a law enforcement officer with the intent of fraudulently impersonating a law enforcement officer, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are a law enforcement officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(2) Any person who willfully wears or uses any badge that falsely purports to be authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of a law enforcement officer, or which so resembles the authorized badge of a law enforcement officer as would deceive any ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of a law enforcement officer, for the purpose of fraudulently impersonating a law enforcement officer, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are a law enforcement officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d), any person who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses, or who willfully makes, sells, loans, gives, or transfers to another, any badge, insignia, emblem, device, or any label, certificate, card, or writing, which falsely purports to be authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of a law enforcement officer, or which so resembles the authorized badge, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of a law enforcement officer as would deceive an ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of a law enforcement officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine, except that any person who makes or sells any badge under the circumstances described in this subdivision is subject to a fine not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).(2) A local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction that files charges against a person for a violation of paragraph (1) shall seize the badge, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing described in paragraph (1).(d) (1) The head of an agency that employs peace officers, as defined in Sections 830.1 and 830.2, is authorized to issue identification in the form of a badge, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing that clearly states that the person has honorably retired following service as a peace officer from that agency. The identification authorized pursuant to this subdivision is separate and distinct from the identification authorized by Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6.(2) If the head of an agency issues a badge to an honorably retired peace officer that is not affixed to a plaque or other memento commemorating the retiree’s service for the agency, the words “Honorably Retired” shall be clearly visible above, underneath, or on the badge itself.(3) The head of an agency that employs peace officers as defined in Sections 830.1 and 830.2 is authorized to revoke identification granted pursuant to this subdivision in the event of misuse or abuse.(4) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term “honorably retired” does not include an officer who has agreed to a service retirement in lieu of termination.(e) (1) Vendors of law enforcement uniforms shall verify that a person purchasing a uniform identifying a law enforcement agency is an employee of the agency identified on the uniform. Presentation and examination of a valid identification card with a picture of the person purchasing the uniform and identification, on the letterhead of the law enforcement agency, of the person buying the uniform as an employee of the agency identified on the uniform shall be sufficient verification.(2) Any uniform vendor who sells a uniform identifying a law enforcement agency, without verifying that the purchaser is an employee of the agency, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).(3) This subdivision shall not apply if the uniform is to be used solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, video production, or a theatrical event, and prior written permission has been obtained from the identified law enforcement agency.(f) Solely for purposes of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of this section, “law enforcement officer” means a peace officer as defined in Section 830, and any federal law enforcement officer.SEC. 4. Section 538e of the Penal Code is amended to read:538e. (a) Any person, other than an officer or member of a fire department, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the authorized uniform, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of an officer or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal, with the intent of fraudulently impersonating an officer or member of a fire department or the Office of the State Fire Marshal, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a fire department or the Office of the State Fire Marshal, or who willfully and credibly impersonates such an officer or member on an internet website, by other electronic means, or by any other means, for purposes of defrauding another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.(b) (1) Any person, other than the one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the badge of a fire department or the Office of the State Fire Marshal with the intent of fraudulently impersonating an officer, or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(2) Any person who willfully wears or uses any badge that falsely purports to be authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, or which so resembles the authorized badge of an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal as would deceive any ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal, for the purpose of fraudulently impersonating an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a fire department, or a deputy state fire marshal, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(c) Any person who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses, or who willfully makes, sells, loans, gives, or transfers to another, any badge, insignia, emblem, device, or any label, certificate, card, or writing, which falsely purports to be authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of an officer, or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal, or which so resembles the authorized badge, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of an officer or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal as would deceive an ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for use by an officer or member of a fire department or a deputy state fire marshal, is guilty of a misdemeanor, except that any person who makes or sells any badge under the circumstances described in this subdivision is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).(d) Any person who, for the purpose of selling, leasing or otherwise disposing of merchandise, supplies or equipment used in fire prevention or suppression, falsely represents, in any manner whatsoever, to any other person that they are a fire marshal, fire inspector or member of a fire department, or that they have the approval, endorsement or authorization of any fire marshal, fire inspector or fire department, or member thereof, is guilty of a misdemeanor.(e) (1) Vendors of uniforms shall verify that a person purchasing a uniform identifying a firefighting agency or department is an employee or authorized member of the agency or department identified on the uniform. Examination of a valid photo identification card issued by a firefighting agency or department that designates the person as an employee or authorized member of the agency or department identified on the uniform shall be sufficient verification.(2) If a person purchasing a uniform does not have a valid photo identification card issued by a firefighting agency or department, the person shall present an official letter of authorization from the firefighting agency or department designating that person as an employee or authorized member of the agency or department. The person shall also present a government issued photo identification card bearing the same name as listed in the letter of authorization issued by the agency or department.(3) Any uniform vendor who sells a uniform identifying a firefighting agency or department without verifying that the purchaser is an employee or authorized member of the agency or department is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).(4) This subdivision shall not apply if the uniform is to be used solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, video production, or a theatrical event, and prior written permission has been obtained from the identified firefighting agency or department.(f) This section shall not apply to either of the following:(1) Use of a badge solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, or video production, or an entertainment or theatrical event.(2) A badge supplied by a recognized employee organization as defined in Section 3501 of the Government Code representing firefighters or a state or international organization to which it is affiliated.SEC. 5. Section 538f of the Penal Code is amended to read:538f. Any person, other than an employee of a public utility or district as defined in Sections 216 and 11503 of the Public Utilities Code, respectively, who willfully presents themselves to a utility or district customer with the intent of fraudulently personating an employee of a public utility or district, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an employee of a public utility or district, or who willfully and credibly impersonates an employee of a public utility or district on an internet website, by other electronic means, or by any other means, for purposes of defrauding another, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit conduct that arguably constitutes protected activity under state labor law or the National Labor Relations Act (Title 29, United States Code, Section 151 and following).SEC. 6. Section 538g of the Penal Code is amended to read:538g. (a) Any person, other than a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the authorized badge, photographic identification card, or insignia of a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, with the intent of fraudulently personating a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, or who willfully and credibly impersonates such an officer or member on an internet website, by other electronic means, or by any other means, for purposes of defrauding another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.(b) Any person who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses, or willfully makes, sells, loans, gives, or transfers to another, any badge, photographic identification card, or insignia, which falsely purports to be for the use of a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, or which so resembles the authorized badge, photographic identification card, or insignia of a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee as would deceive an ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for use by a state, county, city, special district, or city and county officer or employee, is guilty of a misdemeanor, except that any person who makes or sells any badge under the circumstances described in this subdivision is subject to a fine not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).(c) This section shall not apply to either of the following:(1) Use of a badge solely as a prop for a motion picture, television, or video production, or an entertainment or theatrical event.(2) A badge supplied by a recognized employee organization as defined in Section 3501 of the Government Code or a state or international organization to which it is affiliated.SEC. 7. Section 538h of the Penal Code is amended to read:538h. (a) Any person, other than an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the authorized uniform, insignia, emblem, device, label, certificate, card, or writing of an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, with the intent of fraudulently impersonating an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, or uses the same to obtain aid, money, or assistance within this state, or who willfully and credibly impersonates such an officer or member on an internet website, by other electronic means, or by any other means, for purposes of defrauding another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.(b) (1) Any person, other than the one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses the badge of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team with the intent of fraudulently impersonating an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, or fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.(2) Any person who willfully wears or uses any badge that falsely purports to be authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, or that resembles the authorized badge of an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team as would deceive any ordinary reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for the use of one who by law is given the authority of an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, for the purpose of fraudulently impersonating an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, or of fraudulently inducing the belief that they are an officer or member of a government agency managed or affiliated search and rescue unit or team, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.(c) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Member” means any natural person who is registered with an accredited disaster council for the purpose of engaging in disaster service without pay or other consideration. Food and lodging provided, or expenses reimbursed for these items, during a member’s activation do not constitute other consideration.(2) “Search and rescue unit or team” means an entity engaged in the acts of searching for, rescuing, or recovering by means of ground, marine, or air activity, any person that becomes lost, injured, or is killed while outdoors or as a result of a natural or manmade disaster, including instances involving searches for downed or missing aircraft.SEC. 8. Section 1299.07 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1299.07. (a) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not represent themselves in any manner as being a sworn law enforcement officer.(b) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not wear any uniform that represents themselves as belonging to any part or department of a federal, state, or local government. Any uniform shall not display the words United States, Bureau, Task Force, Federal, or other substantially similar words that a reasonable person may mistake for a government agency.(c) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not wear or otherwise use a badge that represents themselves as belonging to any part or department of the federal, state, or local government.(d) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not use a fictitious name that represents themselves as belonging to any federal, state, or local government.(e) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive may wear a jacket, shirt, or vest with the words “BAIL BOND RECOVERY AGENT,” “BAIL ENFORCEMENT,” or “BAIL ENFORCEMENT AGENT” displayed in letters at least two inches high across the front or back of the jacket, shirt, or vest and in a contrasting color to that of the jacket, shirt, or vest.(f) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not use that position for the purposes of immigration enforcement, except pursuant to a valid judicial warrant or court order.(g) An individual authorized by Section 1299.02 to apprehend a bail fugitive shall not disclose or provide in writing, verbally, or in any other manner, personally identifiable information of any bail fugitive that is requested for purposes of immigration enforcement, except pursuant to a valid judicial warrant or court order.(h) For purposes of this section, immigration enforcement includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.(i) This section does not prohibit or restrict any governmental entity or official from sending to, or receiving from, federal immigration authorities, information regarding the citizenship or immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of an individual, or from requesting from federal immigration authorities immigration status information, lawful or unlawful, of any individual, or maintaining or exchanging that information with any other federal, state, or local governmental entity, pursuant to Sections 1373 and 1644 of Title 8 of the United States Code.SEC. 9. Section 13653 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13653. (a) A peace officer, as defined in Section 830, may request an alleged law enforcement officer to present identification when there is probable cause or reasonable suspicion to believe the alleged law enforcement officer has committed a crime, including, but not limited to, impersonating a peace officer in violation of subdivisions (a), (b), or (c), of Section 538d.(b) For purposes of this section, “law enforcement officer” includes a peace officer, as defined in Section 830, and any federal law enforcement officer.SEC. 10. Section 13654 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13654. (a) A law enforcement officer operating in California that is not uniformed, and therefore is not required to clearly display identification pursuant to Section 830.10, shall visibly display identification that includes their agency and either a name or badge number or both name and badge number when performing their enforcement duties, unless expressly exempt under subdivision (b).(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:(1) An officer engaged in active undercover operations or investigative activities.(2) An officer engaged in plainclothes operations who is employed within the California Business, Consumer Services, and Housing Agency, California Health and Human Services Agency, California Labor and Workforce Development Agency, California Natural Resources Agency, California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, California Transportation Agency, California Environmental Protection Agency, California Government Operations Agency, or within any department, board, commission, or other entity in those agencies or the federal equivalents of these state agencies.(3) An officer wearing personal protective equipment that prevents display.(4) Exigent circumstances, involving an imminent danger to persons or property, or the escape of a perpetrator, or the destruction of evidence, including if the officer is responding to those circumstances while off-duty.(5) An officer assigned to Special Weapons and Tactics (SWAT) or tactical team units and actively performing their SWAT or tactical team responsibilities.(6) An officer engaged in protective operations involving elected officials, judicial officers, or other designated dignitaries where the display of identification would compromise the safety, anonymity, or tactical effectiveness of the protection detail.(c) A willful and knowing violation of this section is punishable as a misdemeanor.(d) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Enforcement duties” means active and planned operations involving the arrest or detention of an individual, or deployment for crowd control purposes.(2) “Law enforcement officer” means a peace officer as defined in Section 830, and any federal law enforcement officer.(e) This section, and the penalties established herein, shall not apply to any law enforcement agency, or its personnel, if that agency maintains and publicly posts a written policy pursuant to Section 7288 of the Government Code.(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.SEC. 11. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 12. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 13. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:To keep our immigrant communities safe, especially when under attack, and to boost public safety and trust in law enforcement, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.